src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/proper-contracted_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable propers belonging to DAVVISUOLU-plc, GEAVNNIS-plc, SULLOT-plc, LASSAT-plc

Tests:
  Prop+Sem/Plcer - Kerguelensuolu: # DAVVISUOLU-plc
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Kerguelensullo
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Kerguelensullui
    
  Prop+Sem/Plcer - Stuorrageavŋŋis: # GEAVNNIS-plc
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Stuorrageavgŋá
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Stuorrageavgŋái

  Prop+Sem/Plcer - Doggeráhppát: # SULLOT-plc
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Doggeráhppáid
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Doggeráhppáide
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: doggeráhppálažžii
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: doggeráhppálažžii
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: doggeráhppálažžai
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: doggeráhppálažžai
    
  Prop+Sem/Plcer - Njárgalássát: # LASSAT-plc
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Njárgalássáid
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Njárgalássáide
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: njárgalássálažžii
